Hawaii statutes.
§428-402 Member's liability for
contributions. (a) A member's obligation to contribute money, property,
or other benefit to, or to perform services for, a limited liability company is
not excused by the member's death, disability, or other inability to perform
personally. If a member does not make the required contribution of property or
services, the member or the member's executor, as the case may be, is obligated
at the option of the company to contribute money equal to that portion of the
value of the stated contribution which has not been made.

(b) A creditor of a limited liability company
who extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation described in
subsection (a), and without notice of any compromise under section
428-404(c)(5), may enforce the original obligation. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1; am
L 2001, c 129, §93]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next